Tennessee, session 114, SB0379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
(a) The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations (TACIR)
is directed to conduct a study of how this state's firearm laws impact the following in
regard to each county:
(1) Firearm sales;
(2) Criminal offenses; and
(3) Use of firearms for self-defense.
(b) The study must identify any similarities or dissimilarities between the impacts
identified in subsection (a).
(c) All appropriate state departments and agencies shall provide assistance to
TACIR in connection with the study required by subsection (a).
(d) By no later than January 1, 2026, TACIR shall report its findings to each
member of the general assembly and shall provide a copy of the report to the legislative
librarian. The report may be delivered electronically.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0379
000149
- 1 -